District of Columbia statutes.
3-602

Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the term or terms:

(1)

“Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, or club.

(2)

“Mayor” and “Council” have the meanings given in § 1-201.03.

(3)

“Commission” means the District of Columbia Boxing and Wrestling Commission.

(4)

“School, college, or university” means every school, college, or university supported in whole or in part from public funds and every other school, college or university supported in whole or in part by a religious, charitable, scientific, literary, educational, or fraternal organization which is not operated for profit and no part of the net earnings of which inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual.

(5)

“Participants” means all boxers, wrestlers, performers of martial arts, seconds, managers, matchmakers, promoters, referees, judges, timekeepers, announcers, ushers, ticket sellers, advertising and public relations personnel, and other persons that the Commission may designate who are involved or connected with, other than as a spectator, boxing, wrestling or martial arts contests, matches, exhibitions, or showings, professional as well as amateur, to be held, given, or shown within the District of Columbia.

(6)

Repealed.

(7)

Repealed.

(8)

The term “domestic partner” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 32-701(3).

History

Oct. 8, 1975, D.C. Law 1-20, § 3, 23 DCR 1806
Feb. 26, 1976, D.C. Law 1-50, § 3, 22 DCR 5127
Aug. 13, 1986, D.C. Law 6-137, § 2(a), 33 DCR 3798
Sept. 12, 2008, D.C. Law 17-231, § 9(a), 55 DCR 6758

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-602.
1973 Ed., § 2-1232.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-231 added par. (8).